Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 13. SPORTS, AMUSEMENTS, AND ENTERTAINMENT

SUBTITLE A-1. TEXAS RACING ACT

CHAPTER 2032. LIVESTOCK SHOWS, EXHIBITS, AND FAIRS

Sec. 2032.001. COUNTY LIVESTOCK SHOWS AND EXHIBITS; COUNTY RIGHTS. (a) Subject to the licensing requirements and other provisions of this subtitle, a county may conduct an annual race meeting, not to exceed 16 racing days, in connection with a livestock show or exhibit held under Chapter 319, Local Government Code.

(b) An agent qualified to hold a license under this subtitle and selected by the commissioners court under Section 319.004, Local Government Code, may conduct the race meeting.

(c) This subtitle does not prohibit a county from exercising any right otherwise granted to any person by this subtitle.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 2032.002. COUNTIES HOLDING CERTAIN RACETRACK LICENSES. (a) A county that holds a class 4 racetrack license may conduct an annual race meeting not to exceed five racing days in connection with a livestock show or exhibit held under Chapter 319, Local Government Code. A racing day of the annual race meeting must be conducted on a day when general fair activities are conducted.

(b) A county that holds a class 4 racetrack license may contract with an agent to conduct any portion of a race meeting. The agent must hold a license issued under this subtitle that is appropriate for the service the agent provides.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 2032.003. PUBLIC FAIRS AND LIVESTOCK EXHIBITIONS. Subject to the licensing requirements and other provisions of this subtitle, a nonprofit corporation may conduct a race meeting, not to exceed 16 racing days, for the purpose of encouraging agriculture through the operation of public fairs and livestock exhibitions.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.